Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.055

Penalty for false statements.

Any person who shall knowingly make any false statements, or shall falsify or permit to be falsified any record or records of this retirement system in any attempt to defraud the retirement system as a result of such act, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1947 c 274 s 41; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 11072-41. Formerly RCW 41.40.400.]